Mississippi, session 2026, HB481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-1-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-1-9.  (1)  No driver's license or learner's permit shall be issued pursuant to this article: (a)  To any person under the age of eighteen (18) years except as provided in this article. (b)  To any person whose license to operate a motor vehicle on the highways of Mississippi has been previously revoked or suspended by this state or any other state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia, if the revocation or suspension period has not expired. (c)  To any person who is an habitual drunkard or who is addicted to the use of other narcotic drugs. (d)  To any person who would not be able by reason of physical or mental disability to operate a motor vehicle on the highways with safety.  However, persons who have one (1) arm or leg, or have arms or legs deformed, and are driving a car provided with mechanical devices whereby the person is able to drive in a safe manner over the highways, if otherwise qualified, shall receive an operator's license the same as other persons.  Moreover, deafness shall not be a bar to obtaining a license. (e)  To any person as an operator who has previously been adjudged to be afflicted with and suffering from any mental disability and who has not at time of application been restored to mental competency. (f)  To any person under the age of eighteen (18) years who does not at the time of application present a diploma or other certificate of high school graduation or a general educational development certificate issued to the person in this state or any other state; or on whose behalf documentation has not been received by the Department of Public Safety from that person or a school official verifying that the person: (i)  Is enrolled and making satisfactory progress in a course leading to a general educational development certificate; (ii)  Is enrolled in school in this state or any other state; (iii)  Is enrolled in a "nonpublic school," as such term is defined in Section 37-13-91(2)(i); or (iv)  Is unable to attend any school program due to circumstances deemed acceptable as set out in Section 63-1-10. (g)  To any person under the age of eighteen (18) years who has been convicted under Section 63-11-30. (h)  Beginning on July 1, 2027, to any person who has not previously obtained a driver's license unless that person has successfully completed a Driver Education and Training Program certified by the State Board of Education or the Department of Public Safety; provided, however, a person under the age of eighteen (18) shall be able to receive a learner's permit as otherwise provided in this article. (i)  To any person who is not a United States citizen or resident of Mississippi. (2)  All permits and licenses issued to an individual under the age of eighteen (18) shall be issued as follows: (a)  A learner's permit may be issued to any person who is at least fifteen (15) years of age who otherwise meets the requirements of this article. (b)  A driver's license may be issued to any person who is at least sixteen (16) years of age who otherwise meets the requirements of this article and who has held a learner's permit for at least one (1) year without any conviction under Section 63-11-30 or of a moving violation.  Any conviction under Section 63-11-30 or of a moving violation shall restart the one-year requirement for the holding of a learner's permit before an applicant can qualify for a driver's license. (c)  An applicant for a driver's license who was unable to make timely application for a learner's permit may have the period in which he or she was eligible but unable to apply due to a hardship credited toward the one-year requirement for the holding of a learner's permit.  The Department of Public Safety shall set forth the criteria for which a hardship exception may be granted, at the discretion of the department, to any individual who has completed a Driver Education and Training Program certified by the Board of Education or the Department of Public Safety. (d)  An applicant for a Mississippi driver's license who, at the time of application, is at least sixteen (16) years of age and who has held a valid motor vehicle driver's license issued by another state for at least six (6) months shall not be required to hold a learner's permit before being issued a driver's license. (e)  In addition to the restrictions set forth in Section 63-1-21(3), the commissioner may establish rules, regulations and restrictions for the operation of a motor vehicle during the first twelve (12) months that an individual under the age of eighteen (18) possesses a license. (f)  Beginning July 1, 2026, the Department of Public Safety shall establish a Driver Education and Training Program to be taught throughout the state and made available for home school students and adults who have not otherwise taken a driver's education course.  Upon completion of the course, each participant shall be issued a Certificate of Completion, and a record of the certificate shall be delivered to the Mississippi Driver Service Bureau. (3)  The commissioner shall ensure that the learner's permit and driver's license issued under this article are clear, distinct and easily distinguishable from one another. SECTION 2.  Section 63-1-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-1-19.  (1)  (a)  Every applicant for a license or permit issued pursuant to this article, or for renewal of such license or permit, shall file an application for such license, permit or renewal, on a form provided by the Department of Public Safety, with the commissioner or an official license examiner of the department.  All persons not holding valid, unexpired licenses issued in this state shall be required to secure an original license, except those specifically exempted from licensing under Section 63-1-7.  The application shall state the name, date of birth, the social security number of the applicant unless the applicant is not a United States citizen and does not possess a social security number issued by the United States government, sex, race, color of eyes, color of hair, weight, height and residence address, and whether or not the applicant's privilege to drive has been suspended or revoked at any time, and, if so, when, by whom, and for what cause, and whether any previous application by him has been denied, and whether he has any physical defects which would interfere with his operating a motor vehicle safely upon the highways. (b)  Every applicant for an original license shall show proof of domicile in this state.  The commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to enforce this requirement and shall prescribe the means by which an applicant for an original license may show domicile in this state.  Proof of domicile shall not be required of applicants under eighteen (18) years of age. (c)  Unless the applicant is not a United States citizen and does not possess a social security number issued by the United States government, each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972. (d)  Any person who is not a United States citizen or resident of Mississippi, upon the expiration of his or her driver's license or learner's permit, shall not be entitled to have the license issued or renewed until such time that documentation in the form of a certificate of naturalization, which shall be provided at the time of application for the issuance of a driver's license or learner's permit.  Until such time as proof of naturalization is presented, the person shall only be entitled to receive a state-issued identification card. (2)  No person who is illegally in the United States or Mississippi shall be issued a license.  The application of a person who is not a United States citizen and who does not possess a social security number issued by the United States government shall state the name, date of birth, sex, race, color of eyes, color of hair, weight, height and residence address, and whether or not the applicant's privilege to drive has been suspended or revoked at any time, and, if so, when, by whom, and for what cause, and whether any previous application by him has been denied, and whether he has any physical defects which would interfere with his operating a motor vehicle safely upon the highways.  The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as he deems appropriate requiring additional documents, materials, information or physical evidence to be provided by the applicant as may be necessary to establish the identity of the applicant and that the applicant is not present in the United States or the State of Mississippi illegally. (3)  Whenever a person who has applied for or who has been issued a license or permit under this article moves from the address listed in the application or on the permit or license, or whenever the name of a licensee changes by marriage or otherwise, such person, within thirty (30) days thereafter, shall notify, in writing, the Department of Public Safety, Driver Services Division, and inform the department of his or her previous address and new address and of his or her former name and new name.  The department shall not change the name of a licensee or permittee on his or her license or permit unless the applicant appears in person at an office of the department and provides a certified copy of his or her marriage license, court order, birth certificate or divorce decree changing the licensee's or permittee's name. (4)  (a)  Any male who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but less than twenty-six (26) years of age and who applies for a permit or license or a renewal of a permit or license under this chapter shall be registered in compliance with the requirements of Section 3 of the Military Selective Service Act, 50 USCS Section 3802, as amended. (b)  The department shall forward in an electronic format the necessary personal information of the applicant to the Selective Service System.  The applicant's submission of the application shall serve as an indication that the applicant either has already registered with the Selective Service System or that he is authorizing the department to forward to the Selective Service System the necessary information for registration.  The commissioner shall notify the applicant on, or as a part of, the application that his submission of the application will serve as his consent to registration with the Selective Service System, if so required.  The commissioner also shall notify any male applicant under the age of eighteen (18) that he will be registered upon turning age eighteen (18) as required by federal law. SECTION 3.  Section 63-1-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-1-35.  (1)  The Commissioner of Public Safety shall prescribe the form of license issued pursuant to this article which shall, among other features, include a driver's license number assigned by the Department of Public Safety.  A licensee shall list his social security number with the department which shall cross reference the social security number with the driver's license number for purposes of identification.  Additionally, each license shall bear a full-face color photograph of the licensee in such form that the license and the photograph cannot be separated.  The photograph shall be taken so that one (1) exposure will photograph the applicant and the application simultaneously on the same film.  The department shall use a process in the issuance of a license with a color photograph that shall prevent as nearly as possible any alteration, counterfeiting, duplication, reproduction, forging or modification of the license or the superimposition of a photograph without ready detection.  The photograph shall be replaced by the department at the time of renewal.  Drivers' licenses, including photographs appearing thereon, may be renewed by electronic means according to rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner in conformity to Section 27-104-33. (2)  The commissioner shall * * *prescribe the form of license issued pursuant to this article to licensees not issue a driver's license to applicants who are not United States citizens and who do not possess a social security number issued by the United States government, until such time that the applicant becomes a naturalized citizen who presents documentation of citizenship in the form of a certificate of naturalization which shall be presented at the time of application, as required by Section 63-1-19(1)(d).  The license of such persons shall include a number and/or other identifying features.  The commissioner shall prescribe the form of identification card issued person who are not United States citizens. (3)  Any new, renewal or duplicate driver's license, temporary driving permit or commercial driver's license issued to a person required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 45-33-25 shall bear a designation identifying the licensee or permittee as a sex offender. (4)  The commissioner is authorized to provide the new, renewal or duplicate driver's license, temporary driving permit or commercial driver's license to any honorably discharged veteran as defined in Title 38 of the United States Code, and such license or permit shall exhibit the letters "Vet" or any other mark identifying the person as a veteran.  The veteran requesting the "Vet" designation shall present his DD-214, Military Retiree Identification Card, United States Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Identification Card, United States Department of Veterans Affairs Identification Card or National Guard Form NGB 22.  The veteran requesting the "Vet" designation may present his DD-214, Military Retiree Identification Card, United States Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Identification Card, United States Department of Veterans Affairs Identification Card or National Guard Form NGB 22 in person at the Mississippi Department of Public Safety Driver's License Station. (5)  Not later than July 1, 2021, the commissioner shall develop and implement a driver's license or driving permit in electronic format as an additional option for license or permit holders.  Acceptable electronic formats include display of electronic images on a cellular phone or any other type of electronic device. (6)  If false documents are provided by an individual for purposes of obtaining a veteran driver's license, such action shall be considered fraudulent use of identity under Section 97-19-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall be punishable, upon conviction, as a felony pursuant to the provisions of that section. SECTION 4.  Section 63-1-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-1-47.  (1)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, each applicant for an original or renewal Class R or Class D license issued pursuant to this article, who is entitled to issuance of same, shall be issued a four-year license or an eight-year license, at the option of the applicant, which will expire at midnight on the licensee's birthday and may be renewed any time within six (6) months before the expiration of the license upon application and payment of the required fee, unless required to be reexamined. (b)  The term of an ignition-interlock-restricted license issued under this article shall be four (4) years. (2)  Any commercial driver's license issued under Article 5 of this chapter shall be issued for a five-year term to expire at midnight on the licensee's birthday. (3)  (a)  All applications by an operator under eighteen (18) years of age must be accompanied by documentation that the applicant is in compliance with the education requirements of Section 63-1-9(1)(g), and the documentation used in establishing compliance must be dated no more than thirty (30) days before the date of application. (b)  All applications by an operator under eighteen (18) years of age, if applicable, must be accompanied by documentation signed and notarized by the parent or guardian of the applicant and the appropriate school official, authorizing the release of the applicant's attendance records to the Department of Public Safety as required under Section 63-1-10. (c)  The commissioner shall suspend the driver's license or learner's permit of a student under eighteen (18) years of age who has been reported by the Department of Education as required by Section 63-1-10.1, and shall give notice of the suspension to the licensee as provided in Section 63-1-52(4).  A school superintendent or designee may request that the driver's license or learner's permit that has been suspended under the provisions of this subsection be reinstated after the student has successfully completed nine (9) weeks of school attendance without an unlawful absence. (4)  (a)  Any original or renewal license issued under this chapter to a person who is not a United States citizen shall expire four (4) years from the date of issuance or on the expiration date of the applicant's authorized stay in the United States, whichever is the lesser period of time, and may only be renewed, if the person is otherwise qualified to renew the license in accordance with Section 63-1-19(1)(d) and 63-1-35(2), within thirty (30) days of expiration.  The fee for any such license and for renewal shall be as prescribed in Section 63-1-43. (b)  Any applicant for an original or renewal license under this subsection (4) must present valid documentary evidence documenting that the applicant: (i)  Is a citizen or national of the United States; (ii)  Is an alien lawfully admitted for permanent or temporary residence in the United States; (iii)  Has conditional permanent residence status in the United States; (iv)  Has an approved application for asylum in the United States or has entered into the United States in refugee status; (v)  Has a valid, unexpired nonimmigrant visa or nonimmigrant visa status for entry into or lawful presence in the United States; (vi)  Has a pending application for asylum in the United States; (vii)  Has a pending or approved application for temporary protected status in the United States; (viii)  Has approved deferred-action status; (ix)  Has a pending application for adjustment of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States or conditional permanent resident status in the United States; or (x)  Has a valid employment authorization card issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security. (5)  For any driver's license issued under this chapter, the Department of Public Safety shall send an email and text message notification of an upcoming driver's license expiration date to the known emails and phone numbers authorized by license holders for such notices not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration date of that license. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.